Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.895

Civil penalty.

Every person who fails to comply with this chapter, or any rule adopted under it, may be subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by the director, in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for every such violation. Each and every violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Every person who, through an act of commission or omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this chapter and may be subject to the penalty provided for in this section.

[ 1987 c 393 s 24.]